District of Columbia statutes.
47-1350

Certificate of sale — recording.

The purchaser may record the certificate of sale and the assignee may record the assignment of the certificate of sale in the Recorder of Deeds.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-1372.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).